New York, session 2025-2026, S8893.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Cory M. Rose, a tier VI member of the New York state and local police 3 and fire retirement system employed by the Horseheads village police 4 department and who was previously employed as a part-time employee with 5 the Herkimer county youth bureau program at the Mount Markham central 6 school district and the village of West Winfield public works department 7 from July 15, 2004, through 2005 and who, through no fault of his own 8 and as an error or mistake by the Herkimer county youth bureau program 9 in failing to properly inform Cory M. Rose of his eligibility to enroll 10 in the New York state and local employees' retirement system, did not 11 become a member of the New York state and local employees' retirement 12 system on July 15, 2004, when he became eligible for membership in such 13 system, shall be deemed to have a date of membership with the New York 14 state and local police and fire retirement system of July 15, 2004, if 15 he shall file an application therefore with the state comptroller within 16 one year of the effective date of this act. Upon the receipt of such 17 application, Cory M. Rose shall be granted tier II status in the New 18 York state and local police and fire retirement system and shall be 19 eligible for all the rights and benefits thereof. 20 § 2. All past service costs of implementing the provisions of this act 21 shall be borne by the Horseheads village police department, and there 22 shall be no refund of member contributions to Cory M. Rose. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant Tier 2 status in the New York State and Local Police and Fire Retirement System (NYSLPFRS) to Cory M. Rose, a current Tier 6 member employed by the Horseheads village police department, by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13880-03-6 S. 8893 2 changing their date of membership to July 15, 2004. There will be no refund of member contributions. We estimate that the village of Horseheads' annual contributions will increase $9,500 beginning FYE 2027. Annual costs will vary as the bill- ing rates and salary of Cory M. Rose change. In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost of $2,980 borne by the village of Horseheads as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2027. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated January 12, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-15. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu- aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.